Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Chapter 66. Produce Inspection

§ 851.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Agency” means the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

“Farm” means lands that are owned or leased by a person engaged in any of the activities stated in

10 V.S.A. § 6001(22)

.

“Produce” shall have the same meaning as used in 21 C.F.R. § 112.3.

“Produce farm” means any farm engaged in the growing, harvesting, packing, or holding of produce.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 12, 2016.

§ 852.
Authority.

The Secretary may enforce in the State the requirements of:

the rules adopted under the U.S. Food and Drug Administration Food Safety Modernization Act, Standards for Growing, Harvesting, Packing, and Holding of Produce for Human Consumption, 21 C.F.R. part 112; and

the rules adopted under this chapter.

The Agency may collaborate with the Department of Health regarding application of the U.S. Food and Drug Administration Food Safety Modernization Act, Standards for Growing, Harvesting, Packing, and Holding of Produce for Human Consumption, 21 C.F.R. part 112, and application of the rules adopted under this chapter.

The Secretary shall carry out the provisions of this chapter using:

monies appropriated to the Agency by the federal government for the purpose of administering the federal Food Safety Modernization Act and the rules adopted thereunder;

monies appropriated to the Agency by the State for the purpose of administering this chapter; and

other gifts, bequests, and donations by private entities for the purposes of administering this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 12, 2016; amended

2017, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 28, 2018;

2017, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. May 30, 2018.

§ 853.
Farm inspections.

The Secretary may inspect a produce farm during reasonable hours for the purposes of ensuring compliance with:
(a) (1) The Secretary may inspect a produce farm during reasonable hours for the purposes of ensuring compliance with:

the federal standards for growing, harvesting, packing, and holding of produce for human consumption, as adopted under 21 C.F.R. part 112; or

the rules adopted under this chapter.

This section shall not limit the Secretary’s authority to respond to an emergency in order to prevent a public health hazard under section 21 of this title.

The Secretary may coordinate with other State agencies and organizations to carry out inspections at or near the same time on a given produce farm.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 12, 2016; amended

2017, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 28, 2018;

2017, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. May 30, 2018.

§ 854.
Records.

The owner or operator of a produce farm shall maintain records required by the federal Food Safety Modernization Act, rules adopted thereunder, and rules adopted under this chapter and shall make those records available to the Agency upon request.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 12, 2016.

References in text.

The Food Safety Modernization Act, referenced in this section, is codified at 21 U.S.C. § 2201 et seq.

§ 855.
Rules.

The Secretary may adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 as may be necessary to implement this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 12, 2016.

§ 856.
Enforcement; corrective actions.

When the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets determines that a person is violating the rules listed in section 852 of this title, the Secretary may issue a written warning that shall be served in person or by certified mail, return receipt requested. A warning issued under this section shall include:

a description of the alleged violation;

identification of this section;

identification of the applicable rule violated; and

the required corrective action that the person shall take to correct the violation.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 28, 2018; amended

2017, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. May 30, 2018.

§ 857.
Enforcement; administrative orders.

Notwithstanding the requirements of section 856 of this title, the Secretary at any time may pursue one or more of the following:

issue a cease and desist order to a person the Secretary believes to be in violation of the rules listed in section 852 of this title;

issue a verbal order or written administrative order to protect public health, including orders for the stop sale, recall, embargo, destruction, quarantine, and release of produce, when:

the U.S. Food and Drug Administration requires immediate State action; or

an alleged violation, activity, or farm practice presents an immediate threat to the public health or welfare;

order mandatory corrective actions;

take any action authorized under chapter 1 of this title;

seek administrative or civil penalties in accordance with the requirements of section 15, 16, or 17 of this title.

When the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets issues a cease and desist order, written administrative order, or required corrective action under subsection (a) of this section, the Secretary shall provide the person subject to the order or corrective action with a statement that the order or corrective action is effective upon receipt and the person has 15 days from the date the order or corrective action was issued to request a hearing.

If the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets issues a verbal order under this section, the Secretary shall issue written notice to the person subject to the order within five days of the issuance of the verbal order. The written notice shall include a statement that the person has 15 days from the date the written notice was received to request a hearing.

If a person who receives a cease and desist order, a verbal order, an administrative order, or a mandatory corrective action under this section does not request in writing a hearing within 15 days of receipt of the order or within 15 days of written notice for a verbal order, the person’s right to a hearing is waived. Upon receipt of a written request for a hearing, the Secretary promptly shall set a date and time for a hearing. A request for a hearing on a cease and desist order, verbal order, or administrative order issued under this section shall not stay the order.

A person aggrieved by a final action or decision of the Secretary under this section may appeal de novo to the Civil Division of the Superior Court within 30 days of the final decision of the Secretary.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 28, 2018; amended

2017, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. May 30, 2018;

2019, No. 14

, § 7, eff. April 30, 2019.